morphophonology/foma/vstems.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @P.IL.ON@
! root symbol "√" is used for redups 
! @P.IL.ON@ constrains allomorphy of ICS
! using round brackets to mark optional
! final vowels in roots, these are often deleted
! upon affixation (but not always, need more info)

LEXICON Root
ʔa:√ʔah                    #; ! "be"
ʔab:√ʔab                  #; ! "give x, extend x"
! ʔal:√ʔal                #; ! "LOC" 
ʔatəbəd:√ʔatəbəd          #; ! "die"
@P.IL.ON@ʔili:@P.IL.ON@√ʔil(i)    #; ! "sing"
@P.IL.ON@ʔil:@P.IL.ON@√ʔil        #; ! "side"
ʔišɬ:√ʔišɬ                #; ! "paddle"
ʔəɬəd:√ʔəɬəd              #; ! "eat"
ʔəƛ̕:√ʔəƛ̕                  #; 
ʔəx̌id:√ʔəx̌id              #; ! "what.happened" (NL)
ʔəy̓:√ʔəy̓                  #;
ʔukʷukʷ:√ʔukʷukʷ          #; ! "play"
ʔuləx̌ʷ:√ʔuləx̌ʷ            #;
ʔušəb:√ʔušəb              #; ! "pity"
ʔux̌ʷ:√ʔux̌ʷ                #; ! "go"
bali:√bal(i)              #; ! "forget"
bək̓ʷ:√bək̓ʷ                #; ! "all" (should really be an adverb!)
bəlkʷ:√bəlkʷ              #; ! "return"
biq̓i:√biq̓(i)              #; ! "pressed"
cut:√cut                  #; ! "speak"
cut-ab:√cutab             #; ! "think" (want to say)
čaʔkʷ:√čaʔkʷ              #; ! "seaward"
čaʔkʷ:√čagʷ               #; ! "seaward (var)"
čala:√čal(a)              #; ! "chase"
čal:√čal                  #; ! "how" (NL)
čəɬ:√čəɬ                  #; ! "make" (not sure whether this is a stem)
čəbaʔ:√čəbaʔ              #; ! "loaded.with"
č̓it:√č̓it                  #; ! "near"
čubə:√čub(ə)              #; ! "go.inland"
daʔa:√daʔ(a)              #; ! "named"
dəkʷa:√dəgʷ(a)            #; ! "inside"
diʔiʔ:√diʔiʔ              #; ! "yonder" (incorporated red5)
diʔiʔ:√diʔi               #; ! "yonder" (incorporated red5, var)
dᶻak̓ʷadiʔ:√dᶻak̓ʷadiʔ      #; ! "invite" note: =adiʔ '=ear'
dᶻaq̓:√dᶻaq̓                #; ! "fall"
dᶻəgʷaʔ:√dᶻəgʷaʔ          #; ! "expert"
dᶻəl:√dᶻəl                #; ! "turn"
dᶻixʷ:√dᶻixʷ              #; ! "first"
dᶻub:√dᶻub                #; ! "kick"
dxʷlaq:dxʷ√laq            #; ! "have.children"
gʷaagʷəd:√gʷaagʷəd        #; ! "converse"
gʷəč̓:√gʷəč̓                #; ! "search"
gʷəd:√gʷəd                #; ! "inch down"
gʷəlal:√gʷəlal            #; ! "harm"
gʷəx̌a:√gʷəx̌(a)            #; ! "united"
haʔɬ:√haʔɬ                #; ! "good"
haʔɬ-t:√haʔɬd             #; ! "good" (accounts for haʔɬd-lsuff)
hədʔiw̓:√hədʔiw̓            #; ! "indoors"
həd:√həd                  #; ! "warm"
həliʔ:√həliʔ              #; ! "alive"
hud:√hud                  #; ! "heat"
hiq:√hiq                  #; ! "push"
huyu:√huy(u)              #;
hay:√hay                  #; ! "know"
ǰuʔil:√ǰuʔil              #; ! "joy"
kəwič:√kəwič              #; ! "hunchback"
kʷaʔ:√kʷaʔ                #; ! "probably"
! kʷaxʷa:√kʷaxʷa            #; ! "help"
k̓ʷəɬ:√k̓ʷəɬ                #; 
kʷəda:√kʷəd(a)            #; !"take"
k̓ʷəq:√k̓ʷəq                #; !"fall backwards"
k̓ʷit̕:√k̓ʷit̕                #; !"shoreward"
kiis:√kiis                #; !"stand"
lil:+ʔREDUP+√lil          #; !"far"
luƛ̕:√luƛ̕                  #; !"old"
ɬaq̓a:√ɬaq̓                 #; !"fallen"
ɬaʔ:√ɬaʔ                  #; !"arrive"
ɬal:√ɬal                  #;
ɬaɬ:√ɬaɬ                  #;
@P.IL.ON@ɬaɬlil:@P.IL.ON@√ɬaɬlil   #; !"live"
ləč̓:√ləč̓                  #;
ɬəč̓:√ɬəč̓                  #;
ɬəgʷɬ:√ɬəgʷɬ              #; !"leave"
ɬəgʷɬ:√ɬəgʷəɬ             #; !"leave (var1)"
ɬəgʷəɬ:√ɬəgʷəl             #; !"leave (var2)"
p̓aʔ:+IREDUP+√p̓aʔ          #; !"try"
t̕uk̓ʷ:√t̕uk̓ʷ                #; !"go.home"
t̕ugʷəb:√t̕ugʷəb            #; !"indoors"
qəl:√qəl                  #; !"bad"
@P.IL.ON@q̓ili:@P.IL.ON@√q̓il        #; !"aboard"
qʷacdxʷ:√qʷacdxʷ          #; !"doubt"
qʷɬayʔ:√qʷɬayʔ            #; !"log"
q̓ʷəl:√q̓ʷəl                #;
q̓pu:√q̓pu                  #; !"gather"
xʷit̕:√xʷit̕                #;
ƛ̕uxʷ:√ƛ̕uxʷ                #;
ƛ̕iqi:√ƛ̕iq(i)              #; !"emerge"
ƛ̕iq̓:√ƛ̕iq̓                  #; !"sticky"
qiq̓:√qiq̓                  #; !"confined"
q̓axʷ:√q̓axʷ                #;
lax̌:√lax̌                  #; !"remember"
ləq:√ləq                  #; !"listen"
ɬax̌:√ɬax̌                  #; !"dark"
@P.IL.ON@ɬčil:@P.IL.ON@√ɬčil       #; !"arrive"
ɬik̓ʷ:√ɬik̓ʷ                #; !"hooked"
pusu:√pus(u)              #; !"thrown.at"
qa:√qah                  #; !"many"
saxʷəb:+ʔREDUP+√saxʷəb    #; !"jump"
sət̕:√sət̕                  #; !"lifted"
səgʷq:√səgʷq              #; !"whisper"
sula:√sul(a)              #; !"centered"
šulu:√šul(u)              #; !"go.under"
šuɬ:√šuɬ                  #; !"see"
šac̓:√šac̓                  #; !"finished"
šq:√šq                    #; !"high"
šq:√šəq                   #; !"high" (TODO derive by rule)
šuɬalbut:√šuɬalbut        #; !"able.to.see"
@P.IL.ON@təlawil:@P.IL.ON@√təlawil #; !"run"
t̕aq̓t:√t̕aq̓t                #; !"inland"
təlč:√təlč                #; !"miss"
t̕q̓a:√t̕q̓(a)                #; !"patch"
t̕ugʷəb:√t̕ugʷəb            #; !"nightfall"
wiliq̓ʷi:√wiliq̓ʷi          #; !"ask"
xʷiʔ:√xʷiʔ                #; !"negation"
x̌əd:√x̌əd                  #; !"push"
x̌əb:√x̌əb                  #; !"heavy"
x̌iʔ:√x̌iʔ                  #; !"catch.on"
x̌id:√x̌id                  #; !"what.happened" (SL)
x̌ʷal̕:√x̌ʷal̕                #; !"fail"
yayus:√yayus              #; !"work"
yəc:√yəc                  #; !"report"

! ʔal words are often "prepositions"
! but they can act as verbs 
ʔal:√ʔal                  #; ! "location"


! new from ML basket ogress 
saʔ:√saʔ                  #; !"bad"
lək̓ʷ:√lək̓ʷ                #; !"eaten"
xʷəc:√xʷəc                #; !"removed"
ƛ̕ub:√ƛ̕ub                  #; !"well"
gʷaad:√gʷaad              #; !"down"
qəl̕adiʔ:√qəl̕adiʔ          #; !"up.rooted.tree"
q̓əls:√q̓əls                #; !"steam"
t̕aɬ:√t̕aɬ                  #; !"cross.path"
xʷəb:√xʷəb                #; !"thrown"
ʔibəš:√ʔibəš              #; !"travel"
ʔay̓:√ʔay̓                  #; !"find"
xʷəlk̓ʷ:√xʷəlk̓ʷ            #; !"intoxicated"
taba:√tab(a)              #; !"do"
taba:√tab(ə)              #; !"do"
paɬ:√paɬ                  #; !"flee"
ʔistaʔ:√ʔistaʔ            #; !"be.like"
qadaʔ:√qadaʔ              #; !"steal"
qada:√qada                #; !"steal" (appears without ʔ)
tɬ:√tɬ                    #; !"truly"
q̓ʷibi:√q̓ʷib(i)            #; !"disembark"
qʷibi:√qʷib(i)          #; !"prepared"
ƛ̕iw̓:√ƛ̕iw̓                  #; !"escape"
dᶻəqil:√dᶻəqil            #; !"crawl"
qʷata:√qʷat(a)            #; !"laid.out"
caq̓a:√caq̓(a)              #; !"impaled"
q̓ʷəl:√q̓ʷəl                #; !"cooked"
ciq̓i:√ciq̓i                #; !"poke"
ʔaciɬ:√ʔaciɬ              #; !"pause"
ʔay̓əd:√ʔay̓əd              #; !"companion"
qʷic:√qʷic                #; !"downstream"
ʔaɬx̌əd:√ʔaɬx̌əd            #; !"downstream"
pəd:√pəd                  #; !"buried"
tagʷəxʷ:√tagʷəxʷ          #; !"hungry"
kʷukʷ:√kʷukʷ              #; !"cook"
q̓ax̌:√q̓ax̌                  #; !"uncover"
lab:√lab                  #; !"see"
tatabəb:√tatabəb          #; !"confer" (dict has this as gossip, confer as tatabəd)
cəqɬcut:√cəqɬcut          #; !"sizzle"
dᶻəqil:√dᶻəqil            #; !"crawl"
šubu:√šubu                #; !"disappear"
x̌ilix̌:√x̌ilix̌              #; !"battle"
x̌ɬ:√x̌ɬ                    #; !"sick"
x̌ɬ:√x̌əɬ                   #; !"sick" (TODO derive by rule)
yubil:√yubil              #; !"die"
p̓aƛ̕acut:√p̓aƛ̕acut          #; !"grope"
x̌ʷadᶻa:√x̌ʷadᶻa            #; !"annihilate"
ɬəgʷəɬ:√ɬəgʷəɬ            #; !"leave"
šubali:√šubali            #; !"many.die"
q̓ixʷ:√q̓ixʷ                #; !"upstream"
šqalətxʷ:√šqalətxʷ        #; !"roof" (note: dict has šq=alatxʷ, why not build this from šq?)
kʷaxʷa:√kʷaxʷ(a)          #; !"help"
gʷəbiləd:√gʷəbiləd        #; !"overcooked"
təš:√təš                  #; !"misfortune"
tay:√tay                  #; !"raid"
hədʔiw̓:√hədʔiw̓            #; !"indoors"


! here are adverbs which may
! need their own file at some point
ck̓ʷaqid:c√k̓ʷaqid          #; !"always"

! added because of a form in ML
stab:s√tab                #; !"do"
xʷiʔxʷiʔ:√xʷiʔxʷiʔ        #; !"hunt"
